src/morphology/stems/new_nouns.lexc
LEXICON NOUNS
    NA ;
    NI ;

LEXICON NA_SET
@P.Animate.1@   NA_TAG ;

LEXICON NA_TAG
+NA:0   N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON NI_SET
@P.Animate.%0@    NI_TAG ;

LEXICON NI_TAG
+NI:0 N_PRE_INFL ;

LEXICON N_PRE_INFL
    N_CON_DIM ;

LEXICON NA
zhimaagan    NA_SET    " 1 spear" ; !Rand key:n103000787355n
zhginaawash:zhginaawazh    NA_SET    " 1 earthworm" ; !Rand key:n103000779970n
zhashkaandwech:zhashkaandweny    NA_SET    " 1 flying squirrel (Glaucomys sabrinus)" ; !Rand key:n103000779229n
zhaagoomnagaawansh:zhaagoomnagaawanzh    NA_SET    " 1 gooseberry shrub (Ribes uva-crispa)" ; !Rand key:n103000778831n
zesbikech:zesbikeny    NA_SET    " 1 spider" ; !Rand key:n103000770153n
zaawaakzaat:zaawaakzaad    NA_SET    " 1 yellow poplar" ; !Rand key:n103000769541n
yaabe-bzhiki    NA_SET    " 1 bull" ; !Rand key:n103000767730n
wiiwendbebzon    NA_SET    " 1 scarf" ; !Rand key:n103000757904n
wiisaakdew-nini    NA_SET    " 1 mixed-blood man" ; !Rand key:n103000757313n
wezhge-nini    NA_SET    " 1 cheater [at games]" ; !Rand key:n103000756630n
wedoone    NA_SET    " 1 gossiper" ; !Rand key:n103000756300n
tedbisech:tedbiseny    NA_SET    " 1 tire" ; !Rand key:n103000745725n
skanaak:skanaag    NA_SET    " 1 nit" ; !Rand key:n103000745247n
shaashaagnjigan    NA_SET    " 1 chewing gum" ; !Rand key:n103004167933n
pajaak:pajaag    NA_SET    " 1 penis, prick" ; !Rand key:n103004166891n
paakboojgan    NA_SET    " 1 sawhorse" ; !Rand key:n103004166674n
nookmidzhinniich:nookmidzhinniiny    NA_SET    " 1 a person from the backwoods" ; !Rand key:n103000714009n
nini-bzhiki    NA_SET    " 1 bull" ; !Rand key:n103000712679n
nawaate-kwe    NA_SET    " 1 prostitute, whore" ; !Rand key:n103000696494n
naabganensjigan    NA_SET    " 1 picture puzzle" ; !Rand key:n103000695047n
naabe-bezhgoogzhii    NA_SET    " 1 stallion" ; !Rand key:n103000695003n
mtigwaak:mtigwaag    NA_SET    " 1 log" ; !Rand key:n103000693945n
mshaaboos:mshaabooz    NA_SET    " 1 goat" ; !Rand key:n103000693451n
moogshkaasiins    NA_SET    " 1 hummingbird" ; !Rand key:n103000680621n
mkade-nini    NA_SET    " 1 black man" ; !Rand key:n103000679105n
metgoboozooch:metgoboozoony    NA_SET    " 1 stone boat (i.e. the flat-bottomed sled for hauling stones and other heavy objects)" ; !Rand key:n103000677974n
masndamooch:masndamoony    NA_SET    " 1 water snake (Nerodia sipedon sipedon)" ; !Rand key:n103000660354n
maantaanshiiwnini    NA_SET    " 1 shepherd" ; !Rand key:n103000660076n
kwese    NA_SET    " 1 hen" ; !Rand key:n103000659176n
kwe-bezhgoogzhii    NA_SET    " 1 mare" ; !Rand key:n103000659057n
kiikdaanaangwe    NA_SET    " 1 salamander" ; !Rand key:n103000658552n
kanaashk:kanaashg    NA_SET    " 1 corn cob" ; !Rand key:n103000658284n
gwadaanshiins    NA_SET    " 1 sailboat" ; !Rand key:n103000642666n
gingos:gingoz    NA_SET    " 1 chipmunk" ; !Rand key:n103000616382n
giibaaj    NA_SET    " 1 clown, fool, joker, mischief maker, prankster; bad person" ; !Rand key:n103000583307n
gchi-kandiikan    NA_SET    " 1 buoy" ; !Rand key:n103000560744n
esbikenh-naabiig'igan    NA_SET    " 1 spider web" ; !Rand key:n103004117555n
chiichiishkwech:chiichiishkweny    NA_SET    " 1 killdeer" ; !Rand key:n103004115231n
bkwekjigan    NA_SET    " 1 piece of potato with the leaf bud (used for planting), seed potato" ; !Rand key:n102996019935n
bgojniniins    NA_SET    " 1 a man from the race of Little People (supernatural beings in Nishnaabe folklore)" ; !Rand key:n102995995604n
baataaweshiins    NA_SET    " 1 burr, plant that has small burrs" ; !Rand key:n102995951394n
aakzii-kwe    NA_SET    " 1 [female] nurse" ; !Rand key:n102995927661n
jiibese    NA_SET    " 1 mourning dove" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bddf4f44bb0ac3f23320a01dd02n
namkoons    NA_SET    " 1 leaf bud of swamp poplarCOMMENT: The tree involved might be different; listings of trees of Ontario do not include swamp poplar. Range of swamp poplar is shown as eastern coast of U.S." ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdaf2d846289e3923320a01dd02n
mji'aa    NA_SET    " 1 a bad character, a bad thing" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd785044a9b930c23320a01dd02n
wenda-mnadens    NA_SET    " 1 tea biscuit" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd755204d4c8c2e23320a01dd02n
poknigemik:poknigemig    NA_SET    " 1 Red pine Pinus resinosa" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd5fec84de4a1b323320a01dd02n
LEXICON NI
ziig'agan    NI_SET    " 1 maple sugar, maple candy" ; !Rand key:n103000788434n
zhisjigan    NI_SET    " 1 [citing mother] jigger for ice-fishing (Perhaps the device called a tip-up in Wikipedia article)" ; !Rand key:n103000787618n
zhiigwaabkide    NI_SET    " 1 quicklime [the substance used to whitewash houses], whitewash" ; !Rand key:n103000780911n
zhiigoo'yii    NI_SET    " 1 old garment, rag" ; !Rand key:n103000780840n
zhegwaamgat:zhegwaamgad    NI_SET    " 1 [cutting tool] be dull" ; !Rand key:n103000779635n
zhanoodaagan    NI_SET    " 1 thick rope" ; !Rand key:n103000779212n
zhaabshkaachgan    NI_SET    " 1 sifter" ; !Rand key:n103000778498n
zaaw-jiisens    NI_SET    " 1 carrot" ; !Rand key:n103000769634n
wiinzisaakaajgan    NI_SET    " 1 wig, hairpiece, toupee" ; !Rand key:n103000757291n
waawedooch:waawedoony    NI_SET    " 1 banana" ; !Rand key:n103000755915n
waabnaskdiiyaagan    NI_SET    " 1 testicle" ; !Rand key:n103000746228n
sinii-gamig    NI_SET    " 1 stone house" ; !Rand key:n103000745116n
shaatoons    NI_SET    " 1 [toy] marble" ; !Rand key:n103004167940n
pidyebwin    NI_SET    " 1 seat cushion" ; !Rand key:n103004167085n
nookwe-mjigoodech:nookwe-mjigoodeny    NI_SET    " 1 velvet dress" ; !Rand key:n103000714034n
ninaatgo-ziiwaagmide    NI_SET    " 1 maple syrup" ; !Rand key:n103000712654n
nboobii-emkwaan    NI_SET    " 1 ladle, soup spoon" ; !Rand key:n103000696940n
mwinaagan    NI_SET    " 1 yoke (for carrying pails)" ; !Rand key:n103000693983n
mnwendiiyashk:mnwendiiyashg    NI_SET    " 1 herb for making love medicine" ; !Rand key:n103000680605n
mjikan    NI_SET    " 1 fence" ; !Rand key:n103000679015n
miishtak:miishtag    NI_SET    " 1 twine" ; !Rand key:n103000678592n
manaayechgan    NI_SET    " 1 dock" ; !Rand key:n103000660292n
kii-bmide-waaskonenjgan    NI_SET    " 1 coal oil lamp, kerosene lamp" ; !Rand key:n103000658472n
jiishda'gan    NI_SET    " 1 broom" ; !Rand key:n103000657835n
gzikoojgan    NI_SET    " 1 weigh scale" ; !Rand key:n103000644119n
gwedebnigewin    NI_SET    " 1 temptation" ; !Rand key:n103000642756n
goopdinendaawdiwin    NI_SET    " 1 insult" ; !Rand key:n103000641456n
giipiignimat:giipiignimad    NI_SET    " 1 burlap bag" ; !Rand key:n103000596285n
gichnik:gichnig    NI_SET    " 1 right arm, right [side]" ; !Rand key:n103000581531n
gchipzowin    NI_SET    " 1 belt" ; !Rand key:n103000562255n
gbagoojganiigin    NI_SET    " 1 curtain" ; !Rand key:n103004118859n
gaandkii'gan    NI_SET    " 1 pole [for a boat]" ; !Rand key:n103004118175n
dgwaagmin'gan    NI_SET    " 1 fuel additive (e.g. chainsaw fuel additive), a liquid drink mix (e.g. Coke for rum), a liquid-based ingredient for cooking (e.g. bouillon for soup)" ; !Rand key:n103004116853n
dakoziiwaagan    NI_SET    " 1 ladder" ; !Rand key:n103004115816n
bswaan'kaan    NI_SET    " 1 ditch" ; !Rand key:n103004114591n
bkweg'agan    NI_SET    " 1 [wooden] wedge" ; !Rand key:n102996019926n
biindgeyaatesjigan    NI_SET    " 1 satellite" ; !Rand key:n102996003267n
bezhgoogzhii-bnaakwaan    NI_SET    " 1 horse comb" ; !Rand key:n102995960239n
baashda'gaan    NI_SET    " 1 broadleaf plantain (Plantago major)" ; !Rand key:n102995948720n
aaptawwin    NI_SET    " 1 cane" ; !Rand key:n102995937277n
aabtoogoojgaans    NI_SET    " 1 half slip, petticoat" ; !Rand key:n102995923922n
mbiish-zgagzijgan    NI_SET    " 1 water storage tank" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdefdac4a7fbc8323320a01dd02n
jiigga'gan    NI_SET    " 1 adze" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdd50b844f39e7123320a01dd02n
niibnaakwaanninjiins    NI_SET    " 1 finger" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bdb89184cff8fe323320a01dd02n
naagnigan    NI_SET    " 1 splint [for a basket], stave [for a basket]" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd971d4438dbfd723320a01dd02n
moowaaboo    NI_SET    " 1 watery feces" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd96dbc4ae0873823320a01dd02n
mji'ii    NI_SET    " 1 a bad thing" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd7d93443f3b5fb23320a01dd02n
saswin    NI_SET    " 1 nest" ; !Rand key:n58fa1bd5d68c4a28b0d223320a01dd02n
